Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.187

Rapid permanent supportive housing acquisition and development program.

Subject to amounts appropriated from the apple health and homes account created in RCW 43.330.184 the department of commerce shall establish a rapid permanent supportive housing acquisition and development program to issue competitive financial assistance to eligible organizations under RCW 43.185A.040 and to public development authorities established under RCW 35.21.730 through 35.21.755, for the acquisition or the construction of permanent supportive housing units, subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Awards or loans provided under this section may be used to construct permanent supportive housing units or to acquire real property for quick conversion into permanent supportive housing units which may include predevelopment or development activities, renovation, and building update costs. Awards or loans provided under this section may not be used for operating or maintenance costs associated with providing permanent supportive housing, supportive services, or debt service.

(2) Projects acquired or constructed under this section must serve individuals eligible for a community support services benefit through the apple health and homes program, as established in RCW 74.09.886.

(3) The department of commerce shall establish criteria for the issuance of the awards or loans, including but not limited to:

(a) The date upon which structural modifications or construction would begin and the anticipated date of completion of the project;

(b) A detailed estimate of the costs associated with the construction or acquisition and any updates or improvements necessary to make the property habitable for its intended use;

(c) A detailed estimate of the costs associated with opening the units; and

(d) A financial plan demonstrating the ability to maintain and operate the property and support its intended tenants through the end of the award or loan contract.

(4) The department of commerce shall provide a progress report on its website by June 1, 2023. The report must include:

(a) The total number of applications and amount of funding requested; and

(b) A list and description of the projects approved for funding including state funding, total project cost, number of units, and anticipated completion date.

(5)(a) The funding in this section shall be allocated on an ongoing basis until all funds are expended. The department of commerce shall dispense funds to qualifying applicants within 45 days of receipt of documentation from the applicant for qualifying uses and execution of any necessary contracts with the department in order to effect the purpose of rapid deployment of funds under this section.

(b) The department of commerce shall ensure that proposals that reach the greatest public benefit, as defined by the department, are prioritized. For the purposes of this subsection, "greatest public benefit" must include, but is not limited to:

(i) The greatest number of qualifying permanent supportive housing units created by the state investment, determined by comparing simultaneous applications for funding from the same geographic region; and

(ii) Equitable geographic distribution, to the extent possible, relative to need, as determined by the establishment of regional targets.

[ 2022 c 216 s 8.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Short title—2022 c 216: See notes following RCW 74.09.885.